Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.055

Employee collective bargaining agreements—Publication on school website.

Each school district, charter school, and state-tribal compact school must publish on its website a copy of its public school employee collective bargaining agreements by September 1, 2014, and thereafter must update the website within thirty days of approval, renewal, or amendment of any such agreement.

[ 2014 c 211 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2014 c 211: "It is the legislature's intent to improve the transparency of certain public school data and expenditure information that may currently be available as a public record but is not easily accessible to the general public. For example, there is not a consistent policy for providing easy access to information about either public school employee collective bargaining agreements or associated student body program funds." [ 2014 c 211 s 1.]